2018-komp-ling/practicals/Practical2/HFST/rule_n.twol
Alphabet
 ' a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z

%{'%}:i %{'%}:%'
;


Rules
"sfmfdjgbdjgbkf"
%>:q <=> _ ;

"Remove morpheme boundary"
%{'%}:i <=> _ s ;


! a:b   CONSTRAINT_OPERATOR   LEFT_CONTEXT   _   RIGHT_CONTEXT ;
